Missouri, session 2026, SB1082.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 135.647, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 135.647,
to read as follows:
135.647. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Food bank", any food bank that:
(a) Is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(b) Maintains an established operation involving the
provision of food or edible commodities, or the products of
food or edible commodities, to food pantries, soup kitchens,
hunger relief centers, or other food or feeding centers
that, as an integral part of their normal activities,
provide meals or food to needy persons; and
(c) Is located in the state of Missouri;
(2) "Local food pantry", any food pantry that is:
(a) Exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(b) Distributing emergency food supplies to Missouri
low-income people who would otherwise not have access to
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1082 2
food supplies in the area in which the taxpayer claiming the
tax credit under this section resides;
[(2)] (3) "Local homeless shelter", any homeless
shelter that is:
(a) Exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(b) Providing temporary living arrangements, in the
area in which the taxpayer claiming the tax credit under
this section resides, for individuals and families who
otherwise lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime
residence and lack the resources or support networks to
obtain other permanent housing;
[(3)] (4) "Local soup kitchen", any soup kitchen that
is:
(a) Exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(b) Providing prepared meals through an established
congregate feeding operation to needy, low-income persons
including, but not limited to, homeless persons in the area
in which the taxpayer claiming the tax credit under this
section resides;
[(4)] (5) "Taxpayer", an individual, a firm, a partner
in a firm, corporation, or a shareholder in an S corporation
doing business in this state and subject to the state income
tax imposed by chapter 143, excluding withholding tax
imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265.
2. (1) Beginning on March 29, 2013, any donation of
cash or food made to a local food pantry on or after January
1, 2013, unless such food is donated after the food's
expiration date, shall be eligible for tax credits as
provided by this section.

SB 1082 3
(2) Beginning on August 28, 2018, any donation of cash
or food made to a local soup kitchen or local homeless
shelter on or after January 1, 2018, unless such food is
donated after the food's expiration date, shall be eligible
for a tax credit as provided under this section.
(3) Beginning on August 28, 2026, any donation of cash
or food made to a food bank on or after January 1, 2026,
unless such food is donated after the food's expiration
date, shall be eligible for a tax credit as provided under
this section.
(4) For all tax years ending on or before December 31,
2025, any taxpayer who makes a donation that is eligible for
a tax credit under this section shall be allowed a credit
against the tax otherwise due under chapter 143, excluding
withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, in
an amount equal to fifty percent of the value of the
donations made to the extent such amounts that have been
subtracted from federal adjusted gross income or federal
taxable income are added back in the determination of
Missouri adjusted gross income or Missouri taxable income
before the credit can be claimed. For all tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026, any taxpayer who
makes a donation that is eligible for a tax credit under
this section shall be allowed a credit against the tax
otherwise due under chapter 143, excluding withholding tax
imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, in an amount up to
seventy percent of the value of the donations made to the
extent such amounts that have been subtracted from federal
adjusted gross income or federal taxable income are added
back in the determination of Missouri adjusted gross income
or Missouri taxable income before the credit can be
claimed. Each taxpayer claiming a tax credit under this

SB 1082 4
section shall file an affidavit with the income tax return
verifying the amount of their contributions. The amount of
the tax credit claimed shall not exceed the amount of the
taxpayer's state tax liability for the tax year that the
credit is claimed and shall not exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars per taxpayer claiming the credit. Any
amount of credit that the taxpayer is prohibited by this
section from claiming in a tax year shall not be refundable,
but may be carried forward to any of the taxpayer's three
subsequent tax years. No tax credit granted under this
section shall be transferred, sold, or assigned. No
taxpayer shall be eligible to receive a credit pursuant to
this section if such taxpayer employs persons who are not
authorized to work in the United States under federal law.
No taxpayer shall be able to claim more than one credit
under this section for a single donation.
3. (1) For all tax years ending on or before December
31, 2025, the cumulative amount of tax credits under this
section which may be allocated to all taxpayers contributing
100 to a local food pantry, local soup kitchen, or local
101 homeless shelter in any one fiscal year shall not exceed one
102 million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars. For all tax
103 years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the cumulative
104 amount of tax credits under this section which may be
105 allocated to all taxpayers contributing to a food bank,
106 local food pantry, local soup kitchen, or local homeless
107 shelter in any one fiscal year shall not exceed three
108 million five hundred thousand dollars. The director of
109 revenue shall establish a procedure by which the cumulative
110 amount of tax credits is apportioned among all taxpayers
111 claiming the credit by April fifteenth of the fiscal year in
112 which the tax credit is claimed. To the maximum extent

SB 1082 5
113 possible, the director of revenue shall establish the
114 procedure described in this subsection in such a manner as
115 to ensure that taxpayers can claim all the tax credits
116 possible up to the cumulative amount of tax credits
117 available for the fiscal year.
118 (2) In the event a full or partial credit denial, due
119 to the cumulative maximum amount of credits being claimed
120 for the fiscal year, causes a tax balance due to be owed to
121 the state by the taxpayer, the taxpayer shall not be held
122 liable for any addition to tax, penalty, or interest on that
123 tax balance due, provided the balance is paid, or approved
124 payment arrangements have been made, within sixty days from
125 issuance of the notice of credit denial.
126 4. Any food bank, local food pantry, local soup
127 kitchen, or local homeless shelter may accept or reject any
128 donation of food made under this section for any reason.
129 For purposes of this section, any donations of food accepted
130 by a food bank, local food pantry, local soup kitchen, or
131 local homeless shelter shall be valued at fair market value,
132 or at wholesale value if the taxpayer making the donation of
133 food is a retail grocery store, food broker, wholesaler, or
134 restaurant.
135 5. The department of revenue shall promulgate rules to
136 implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or
137 portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
138 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
139 this section shall become effective only if it complies with
140 and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
141 if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
142 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
143 the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
144 delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule

SB 1082 6
145 are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
146 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
147 August 28, 2007, shall be invalid and void.
148 6. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
149 (1) The program authorized under this section shall
150 [be reauthorized as of August 28, 2018, and shall expire on
151 December 31, 2026, unless reauthorized by the general
152 assembly; and] automatically sunset on December 31, 2032,
153 unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
154 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of
155 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
156 which the program authorized [under] pursuant to this
157 section is sunset; and
158 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
159 construed to [limit or in any way impair a taxpayer's
160 ability to redeem tax credits authorized on or before the
161 date the program authorized under this section expires]
162 impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any obligations,
163 including the authorization, issuance, or redemption of tax
164 credits, incurred pursuant to this section prior to the date
165 the program authorized pursuant to this section is sunset.
✓